Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1883XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 25 Section 1. Section 327D.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 327D.3 Duty to furnish cars and transport freight ââ railroad 3 train length limit . 4 1. Every railway corporation shall upon receiving 5 reasonable notice, and within a reasonable time, furnish shall 6 do all of the following: 7 a. Furnish suitable cars to any and all persons who may 8 apply therefor, for use of such cars for the transportation of 9 any and all kinds of freight , and receive . 10 b. Receive and transport such freight with all reasonable 11 dispatch , and provide . 12 c. Provide and keep suitable facilities for the receiving 13 and handling thereof of all freight at any depot on the line of 14 its road. 15 2. A railway corporation shall not operate, or permit to be 16 operated, any freight or work railroad train that exceeds eight 17 thousand five hundred feet in length on any part of a railroad. 18